Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
CHAPTER 198 Houses of Reform [Repealed]

198.010.
Department of Welfare to accept gifts to houses of reform. [Repealed.]

198.020.
Type of buildings; segregation of inmates. [Repealed.]

198.030.
Boys and girls to be in separate institutions; races separated. [Repealed.]

198.040.
Aim of houses of reform; qualifications of employes. [Repealed.]

198.050.
Education and training of inmates. [Repealed.]

198.060.
Employment of inmates; use of products. [Repealed.]

198.070.
Bonds of officers and employes. [Repealed.]

198.080.
Fees for conveyance of child to house of reform. [Repealed.]

198.090.
Counties to contribute to maintenance. [Repealed.]

198.100.
Removal of convicts from penitentiary to house of reform. [Repealed.]

198.110.
Girls may be released on trial; visiting agents. [Repealed.]